Washington statutes.
RCW 11.68.112

Final distribution upon declaration and notice of filing of declaration of completion of probate—Special powers of personal representative—Discharge from liability.

If the declaration of completion of probate and the notice of filing of declaration of completion of probate state that the personal representative intends to make final distribution within five business days after the final date on which a party as defined in RCW 11.96A.030 entitled to notice under RCW 11.68.110 could file a petition under RCW 11.68.110(3), which date is referred to in this section as the "effective date of the declaration of completion," if the notice of filing of declaration of completion of probate sent to each party as defined in RCW 11.96A.030 entitled to notice under RCW 11.68.110 specifies the amount of the minimum distribution to be made to that party, and if no party as defined in RCW 11.96A.030 entitled to notice under RCW 11.68.110 petitions the court under RCW 11.68.110(3) within 30 days from the date of filing a declaration of completion of probate, the personal representative retains, for five business days following the effective date of the declaration of completion, the power to make the stated minimum distributions. In this case, the personal representative is discharged from all liability other than any liability relating to the actual distribution of the reserve, at the effective date of the declaration of completion. The personal representative is only discharged from liability for the distribution of the reserve when the whole reserve has been distributed and each beneficiary has received at least the distribution which that beneficiary's notice stated that the beneficiary would receive.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4015; 1997 c 252 s 69.]

NOTES:

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: See note following RCW 11.48.130.

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.